Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 20192-2636
Pesticide applicators; restrictions; department; duties; reciprocity.

(1) The department shall license pesticide applicators involved in the categories established in 40 C.F.R. part 171, as the regulation existed on January 1, 2019, and any other categories established pursuant to rules and regulations necessary to meet the requirements of the state. The department may issue a reciprocal license to a pesticide applicator licensed or certified in another state or by a federal agency. Residents of the State of Nebraska are not eligible for reciprocal certification. The department may waive part or all of any license certification examination requirements for a reciprocal license if the other state or federal agency that licensed or certified the pesticide applicator has substantially the same certification examination standards and procedural requirements as required under the Pesticide Act.

(2) A person shall not use a restricted-use pesticide unless the person is:

(a) At least eighteen years of age except as provided in subsection (6) of section 2-2642;

(b) Licensed and authorized by the license to use the restricted-use pesticide in the category covering the proposed pesticide use; or

(c) Working under the direct supervision of a licensed certified applicator pursuant to subsection (5) of section 2-2642.

(3) A person shall not use lawn care or structural pest control general-use pesticides on the property of another person for hire or compensation unless the person is:

(a) Licensed as a commercial applicator; or

(b) At least sixteen years of age and working under the direct supervision of a licensed certified applicator pursuant to subsection (4) of section 2-2642.

(4) An employee or other person acting on behalf of any political subdivision of the state shall not use general-use pesticides for outdoor vector control unless the applicator is:

(a) Licensed as a commercial applicator or a noncommercial applicator; or

(b) At least sixteen years of age and working under the direct supervision of a licensed certified applicator pursuant to subsection (4) of section 2-2642.

Laws 1993, LB 588, § 15;

Laws 2002, LB 436, § 9;

Laws 2006, LB 874, § 7;

Laws 2009, LB100, § 2;

Laws 2013, LB69, § 6;

Laws 2019, LB320, § 8.